Missouri, session 2026, SB1689.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 321.220, RSMo, is repealed and one new
section enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as section 321.220,
to read as follows:
321.220. For the purpose of providing fire protection
to the property within the district, the district and, on
its behalf, the board shall have the following powers,
authority and privileges:
(1) To have perpetual existence;
(2) To have and use a corporate seal;
(3) To sue and be sued, and be a party to suits,
actions and proceedings;
(4) To enter into contracts, franchises and agreements
with any person, partnership, association or corporation,
public or private, affecting the affairs of the district,
including contracts with any municipality, district or
state, or the United States of America, and any of their
agencies, political subdivisions or instrumentalities, for
the planning, development, construction, acquisition or
operation of any public improvement or facility, or for a
common service relating to the control or prevention of
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1689 2
fires, including the installation, operation and maintenance
of water supply distribution, fire hydrant and fire alarm
systems; provided, that a notice shall be published for bids
on all construction or purchase contracts for work or
material or both, outside the authority contained in
subdivision (9) of this section, involving an expense of ten
thousand dollars or more;
(5) Upon approval of the voters as herein provided, to
borrow money and incur indebtedness and evidence the same by
certificates, notes or debentures, and to issue bonds, in
accordance with the provisions of this chapter;
(6) To acquire, construct, purchase, maintain, dispose
of and encumber real and personal property, fire stations,
fire protection and fire-fighting apparatus and auxiliary
equipment therefor, and any interest therein, including
leases and easements;
(7) To refund any bonded indebtedness of the district
without an election. The terms and conditions of refunding
bonds shall be substantially the same as those of the
original issue of bonds, and the board shall provide for the
payment of interest, at not to exceed the legal rate, and
the principal of such refunding bonds in the same manner as
is provided for the payment of interest and principal of
bonds refunded;
(8) To have the management, control and supervision of
all the business and affairs of the district, and the
construction, installation, operation and maintenance of
district improvements therein;
(9) To hire and retain agents, employees, engineers
and attorneys, including part-time or volunteer firemen;
(10) To have and exercise the power of eminent domain
and in the manner provided by law for the condemnation of

SB 1689 3
private property for public use to take any property within
the district necessary to the exercise of the powers herein
granted;
(11) To receive and accept by bequest, gift or
donation any kind of property. Notwithstanding any other
provision of law to the contrary, any property received by
the fire protection district as a gift or any property
purchased by the fire protection district at a price below
the actual market value of the property may be returned to
the donor or resold to the seller if such property is not
used for the specific purpose for which it was acquired;
(12) To adopt and amend bylaws, fire protection and
fire prevention ordinances, and any other rules and
regulations not in conflict with the constitution and laws
of this state, necessary for the carrying on of the
business, objects and affairs of the board and of the
district, and refer to the proper authorities for
prosecution any infraction thereof detrimental to the
district. However, fire protection and fire prevention
ordinances shall not be exercised so as to impose
regulations or to require permits with respect to the
erection, maintenance, repair, alteration, or extension of
farm buildings or farm structures. Any person violating any
such ordinance is hereby declared to be guilty of a
misdemeanor, and upon conviction thereof shall be punished
as is provided by law therefor. The prosecuting attorney
for the county in which the violation occurs shall prosecute
such violations in the circuit court of that county. The
legal officer or attorney for the fire district may be
appointed by the prosecuting attorney as special assistant
prosecuting attorney for the prosecution of any such
violation. The enactments of the fire district in

SB 1689 4
delegating administrative authority to officials of the
district may provide standards of action for the
administrative officials, which standards are declared as
industrial codes adopted by nationally organized and
recognized trade bodies. The board shall have the power to
adopt an ordinance, rule, or regulation allowing the
district to charge businesses or individuals, and their
insurance company as defined in section 376.020, unless
coverage for fire district responses is explicitly excluded
under the business' or individual's applicable insurance
policy, [who reside outside of the district, but] who
receive emergency services within the boundaries of the
district, for the actual and reasonable cost of such
services, except that individuals who reside within the
district, and businesses with a physical address within the
district, shall not be subject to such charges. However,
such actual and reasonable costs shall not exceed one
hundred dollars for responding to each fire call or alarm
100 and two hundred fifty dollars for each hour or a
101 proportional sum for each quarter hour spent in [combating]
102 responding to a fire or emergency;
103 (13) To pay all court costs and expenses connected
104 with the first election or any subsequent election in the
105 district;
106 (14) To have and exercise all rights and powers
107 necessary or incidental to or implied from the specific
108 powers granted herein. Such specific powers shall not be
109 considered as a limitation upon any power necessary or
110 appropriate to carry out the purposes and intent of this
111 chapter;
112 (15) To provide for health, accident, disability and
113 pension benefits for the salaried members of its organized

SB 1689 5
114 fire department of the district and such other benefits for
115 their spouses and eligible unemancipated children, through
116 either or both a contributory or noncontributory plan. For
117 purposes of this section, "eligible unemancipated child"
118 means a natural or adopted child of an insured, or a
119 stepchild of an insured who is domiciled with the insured,
120 who is less than twenty-three years of age, who is not
121 married, not employed on a full-time basis, not maintaining
122 a separate residence except for full-time students in an
123 accredited school or institution of higher learning, and who
124 is dependent on parents or guardians for at least fifty
125 percent of his or her support. The type and amount of such
126 benefits shall be determined by the board of directors of
127 the fire protection district within the level of available
128 revenues of the pension program and other available revenues
129 of the district. If an employee contributory plan is
130 adopted, then at least one voting member of the board of
131 trustees shall be a member of the fire district elected by
132 the contributing members, which shall not be the same as the
133 board of directors;
134 (16) To contract with any municipality that is
135 contiguous to a fire protection district for the fire
136 protection district to provide fire protection to the
137 municipality for a fee as hereinafter provided;
138 (17) To provide for life insurance, accident,
139 sickness, health, disability, annuity, length of service,
140 pension, retirement and other employee-type fringe benefits,
141 subject to the provisions of section 70.615, for the
142 volunteer members of any organized fire department of the
143 district and such other benefits for their spouses and
144 eligible unemancipated children, through either a
145 contributory or noncontributory plan, or both. For purposes

SB 1689 6
146 of this section, "eligible unemancipated child" means a
147 natural or adopted child of an insured, or a stepchild of an
148 insured who is domiciled with the insured, who is less than
149 twenty-three years of age, who is not married, not employed
150 on a full-time basis, not maintaining a separate residence
151 except for full-time students in an accredited school or
152 institution of higher learning, and who is dependent on
153 parents or guardians for at least fifty percent of his or
154 her support. The type and amount of such benefits shall be
155 determined by the board of directors of the fire protection
156 district within available revenues of the district,
157 including the pension program of the district. The
158 provision and receipt of such benefits shall not make the
159 recipient an employee of the district. Directors who are
160 also volunteer members may receive such benefits while
161 serving as a director of the district;
162 (18) To contract for services with any rural,
163 volunteer or subscription fire department or organization,
164 or volunteer fire protection association, as defined in
165 section 320.300, for the purpose of providing the benefits
166 described in subdivision (17) of this section.
✓